apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<pardef n="díolúin/e__n">
  <e><p><l>e-s</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>e-s</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ese</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ese</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí-s</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí-s</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí-s</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tí</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tíse</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tíse</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>tíse</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dírshl/iocht__n">
  <e><p><l>eachta-s</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachta-s</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachta-s</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachta-s</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachta</l>    <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachta</l>    <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachta</l>    <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachta</l>    <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachtasa</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachtasa</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachtasa</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eachtasa</l>  <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iocht-s</l>   <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iocht</l>     <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iochtsa</l>   <r>iocht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dí/th__n">
  <e><p><l>oth-s</l>     <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>oth</l>       <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>otha-s</l>    <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>otha-s</l>    <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>otha</l>      <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>otha</l>      <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>othasa</l>    <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>othasa</l>    <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>othsa</l>     <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>th-s</l>      <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>th</l>        <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>the-s</l>     <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>the</l>       <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>these</l>     <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>thse</l>      <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="díthre/abh__n">
  <e><p><l>abh-s</l>     <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abh-s</l>     <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abh</l>       <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abh</l>       <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abha-s</l>    <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abha-s</l>    <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abha</l>      <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abha</l>      <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abhasa</l>    <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abhasa</l>    <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abhsa</l>     <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abhsa</l>     <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ibhe-s</l>    <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ibhe</l>      <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ibhese</l>    <r>abh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dúcha/nn__n">
  <e><p><l>inn-s</l>     <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>inn</l>       <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>innse</l>     <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nn-s</l>      <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nn-s</l>      <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nn</l>        <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nn</l>        <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nna-s</l>     <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nna-s</l>     <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nna</l>       <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nna</l>       <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nnasa</l>     <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nnasa</l>     <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nnsa</l>      <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nnsa</l>      <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="díolúine"><i>díolúin</i><par n="díolúin/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="dírshliocht"><i>dírshl</i><par n="dírshl/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="díth"><i>dí</i><par n="dí/th__n"/></e>
<e lm="díthreabh"><i>díthre</i><par n="díthre/abh__n"/></e>
<e lm="dúchann"><i>dúcha</i><par n="dúcha/nn__n"/></e>
<e lm="idirshliocht"><i>idirshl</i><par n="dírshl/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="reabh"><i>re</i><par n="díthre/abh__n"/></e>
<e lm="ríshliocht"><i>ríshl</i><par n="dírshl/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="saorshliocht"><i>saorshl</i><par n="dírshl/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="sliocht"><i>sl</i><par n="dírshl/iocht__n"/></e>
<e lm="sreabh"><i>sre</i><par n="díthre/abh__n"/></e>
